Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DEVELOPMENTAL DELAY AGE LIMIT WORKING GROUP.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Working group. new text end new text begin The Department of Education must establish a working group on the age limit for children receiving special education services for developmental delay. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Members. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of education must consult with the organizations identified in paragraph (b) before naming appointed members to the working group. new text end new text begin (b) By July 1, 2025, the commissioner must appoint the following members to the working group: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner or the commissioner's designee; new text end new text begin (2) two representatives from Minnesota Administrators for Special Education, consisting of one member from the seven-county metropolitan area and one member from outside the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (3) one representative from the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board; new text end new text begin (4) two representatives from the Minnesota Association of Colleges for Teacher Education; new text end new text begin (5) two representatives from Education Minnesota, consisting of one member from the seven-county metropolitan area and one member from outside the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (6) two representatives from the PACER Center; and new text end new text begin (7) two representatives from the Minnesota School Psychologists Association, consisting of one member working in a school setting and one member working in a postsecondary school psychologist preparation program. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The working group must meet on a regular basis and review current law limiting the eligibility of children seven years old or older from receiving intervention services for developmental delay, and assess the impact of extending eligibility to children under age nine. The working group must report its findings and recommendations to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education by February 1, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administrative provisions. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner or commissioner's designee must convene the initial meeting of the working group. Upon request, the commissioner must provide meeting space and administrative support for the group. new text end new text begin (b) Members of the working group serve without compensation or payment of expenses. new text end new text begin (c) The working group expires February 1, 2026, or upon submission of the report to the legislature required under subdivision 3, whichever is earlier. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end